Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-309
Electrical transmission lines; state or federal highways; regulation by Department of Transportation.

If the public road, along, upon, across, or under which the right to construct, operate, and maintain the electrical transmission line is granted, is a state or federal highway, then the location and installation of the electrical transmission facilities, insofar as they pertain to the present and future use of the rights-of-way for highway purposes, shall be subject to reasonable regulations and restrictions prescribed by the Department of Transportation. If the future use of the state or federal highway requires the moving or relocating of the facilities, then such facilities shall be removed or relocated by the owner, at the owner's cost and expense, and as directed by the Department of Transportation except as provided by section 39-1304.02.

Laws 1943, c. 231, § 2, p. 780;

R.S.1943, § 86-308.01;

Laws 1957, c. 171, § 4, p. 593;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-308.01;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 472;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 245.